Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 3. Disclosure and Advertising

§ 40-14-222.
Applicability; information required.

For purposes of this part, consumer credit sale includes the sale of an interest in land without regard to the rate of the credit service charge if the sale is otherwise a consumer credit sale (W.S.

40-14-204

).

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

The lessor shall disclose to the lessee to whom credit is extended with respect to a consumer lease the information required by this part.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 2.

Disclosure and advertising of consumer credit shall be made pursuant to the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-301; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-301; Laws 1975, ch. 167, § 1; 1982, ch. 61, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed (e) which read: “The information required under this part shall include a full statement of closing costs to be incurred by the consumer which shall be presented, in accordance with regulations of the administrator prior to the time when any down payment is made, or, in the case of a consumer credit sale involving real property, at the time the creditor makes a commitment with respect to the transaction. The administrator may provide by regulation that any portion of the information required to be disclosed by this part may be given in the form of estimates where the provider of such information is not in a position to know exact information.” and rewrote (f).

State rather than federal disclosure standards apply. —

All classes of credit transactions in the state of Wyoming have been declared exempt from the disclosure requirements of the federal Truth in Lending Act, by the federal reserve board under the authority granted it by that act. This exemption serves to replace the federal requirements with those set forth in this chapter, which are almost identical. Hinkle v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 538 F.2d 295, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 8089 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

But federal civil liability and concurrent jurisdiction provisions apply. —

The exemption of credit transactions in Wyoming from the disclosure requirements of the federal Truth in Lending Act by its own terms does not exempt state transactions from the civil liability provisions of the federal act, but rather makes exception for that remedy. This would seem to also protect the concurrent jurisdiction created in the federal act. Hinkle v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 538 F.2d 295, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 8089 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

And only 1 recovery possible. —

Where the Wyoming disclosure provisions require the seller to disclose to the credit consumer “… the information required by either this part or the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act …,” the state and federal requirements are the same. Thus, the action remains one in which federal courts have subject matter jurisdiction, but there is but one cause of action and thus but one recovery for a nondisclosure. Hinkle v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 538 F.2d 295, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 8089 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Lender's Labyrinth and the Banker's Burden: The Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 and the 1975 Amendments,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 383 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “business or commercial” purpose within meaning of § 104(1) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1603(1)), exempting business or commercial credit transactions from act, 54 ALR Fed 491.

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§§ 40-14-223 and 40-14-224.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 191, §§ 2-302 and 2-303, related to disclosure requirements. For present similar provisions see §§

40-14-222

and

40-14-320

.

§ 40-14-225.
Statement of rate.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

A statement of rate complies with this part if it does not vary from the accurately computed rate by more than the following tolerances:

The annual percentage rate may be more or less than the actual rate by not more than one-eighth of one percent (.125%) or may be rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one percent (.25%) for consumer credit sales payable in substantially equal installments when a seller determines the total credit service charge on the basis of a single add-on, discount, periodic or other rate, and the rate is converted into an annual percentage rate under procedures prescribed by rule by the administrator;

The administrator may authorize by rule the use of rate tables or charts which may provide for the disclosure of annual percentage rates which vary from the rate determined in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection by not more than the tolerances the administrator may allow; the administrator may not allow a tolerance greater than eight percent (8%) of that rate except to simplify compliance where irregular payments are involved; and

In case a seller determines the annual percentage rate in a manner other than as described in paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection, the administrator may authorize by rule other reasonable tolerances.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-304; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-304; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to disclosure, see §§

40-14-222

and

40-14-320

.

§§ 40-14-226 through 40-14-234.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 61, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 191, §§ 2-305 through 2-313, related to disclosure requirements. For present similar provisions, see §§

40-14-222

and

40-14-320

.